Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 6. Real Property Escheated to State.

Administrative Code. —

For escheated real property, see 11 AAC 69.

Sec. 38.95.200.
Real property subject to escheat.

Real property in an intestate estate for which no taker can be found and real property devised by will for which no devisee, heir, or other claimant can be found escheats to the state.

Real property of a defunct organization or corporation, for which no proceeding for distribution has been instituted within four years after the organization becomes defunct, escheats to the state.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Escheat, §§ 5, 12 et seq.

30A C.J.S., Escheat, §§ 3, 6 et seq.

Sec. 38.95.210.
Enforcement of rights by department.

When the Department of Natural Resources is informed or has reason to believe that real property has escheated to the state, the department shall bring an action in superior court to establish whether the property has escheated to the state.

The department may maintain an action to recover the possession of escheated property, or for the enforcement of the state’s right to the property.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 38.95.220.
Judgment of escheat.

If the superior court determines that the real property has escheated to the state, the superior court shall issue a judgment of escheat.

A court order approving settlement of an estate that distributes real property to the state is a judgment of escheat.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 38.95.230.
Management of escheated real property by department.

After a judgment of escheat under AS

38.95.220

, the department may sell, lease, exchange, assign, or otherwise manage real property that has escheated to the state. In determining the proper disposition of escheated real property the department shall, within two years after the judgment of escheat under AS

38.95.220

, make a written finding that it is in the best interests of the state either to

obtain an appraisal of the fair market value of the real property and sell, lease, exchange, assign, or otherwise manage the property, including retention in state management; or

retain the real property in state management without obtaining an appraisal.

The appraised value of property handled under (a)(1) of this section, or the selling price from a sale under AS

38.05.055

if it is lower, less the expenses of sale or appraisal, is the established value of the property for purposes of redemption by an heir or other taker under AS

38.95.240(c)

.

Seven years after the judgment of escheat, real property that has not been otherwise disposed of by the department becomes general state land for classification, disposal, and use.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For escheated real property, see 11 AAC 69.

Sec. 38.95.240.
Time within which to claim escheated real property.

Within seven years after a judgment of escheat under AS

38.95.220

, a person who is not a party to the escheat proceeding may bring an action in the superior court to prove the person’s claim to the real property. If the plaintiff establishes the claim and establishes that the plaintiff had no knowledge of the prior escheat proceeding, the court shall award the plaintiff the property if it has been managed under AS

38.95.230(a)(2)

, or the appraised value of the property under AS

38.95.230(b)

if the property has been managed under AS

38.95.230(a)(1)

.

If it is determined that the plaintiff is entitled to the property, the department shall deliver the property to the plaintiff. The rents, profits, interest, or dividends that accrue to the state during its possession of the property are the property of the state and may not be recovered.

If it is determined that the plaintiff is entitled to the appraised value of property that has been disposed of under AS

38.95.230(a)(1)

, at the department’s discretion it may offer to the plaintiff land owned by the state and available for disposal that is of comparable value to the appraised value under AS

38.95.230(a)(1)

. If the department does not offer land of comparable value, or if the plaintiff refuses the department’s offer, the plaintiff is entitled to the established value of the property under AS

38.95.230(b)

.

The time limitation of seven years does not apply to a minor or an incapacitated person as defined by AS

13.26.005

, but such a person must bring an action to prove the person’s claim to the real property within one year after the incapacity ceases.

This section does not prevent the state from transferring escheated real property to a person who provides proof satisfactory to the department that the person is the owner of the real property when the department determines the transfer to be appropriate.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For escheated real property, see 11 AAC 69.

Sec. 38.95.250.
Proceeds of sale or redemption.

The department shall deposit the proceeds of real property sold under AS

38.95.230(a)(1)

less the expenses of sale, including attorney fees and appraisal and publication costs, in an escheated real property trust account. The department shall maintain the proceeds in the account for a period of at least seven years after the date of the judgment of escheat. The department may use money in the trust account to pay claims made under AS

38.95.240

.

All money collected under (a) of this section not required to be kept in the escheated real property trust account shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 52 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For escheated real property, see 11 AAC 69.

Sec. 38.95.260.
Disposition of sale proceeds seven years after the judgment of escheat.

Seven years after the judgment of escheat, net proceeds from the sale of escheated real property may be transferred from the escheated real property trust account to the general fund and credited to the land disposal income account under AS

38.04.022

, unless a person who was the owner or one of the owners of the property when the property escheated to the state has outstanding child support obligations, in which case the proportion of the net proceeds that is attributable to the ownership interest of the person shall be applied to the satisfaction of the child support obligations and the balance remaining after the satisfaction shall be credited to the land disposal income account.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 38.95.270.
Definition.

In AS

38.95.200

—

38.95.270

, “department” means the Department of Natural Resources.

History.

(§ 12 ch 133 SLA 1986)